Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201319-5209
Exemption from taxation.

The
real property of a land bank and the land bank's income and operations are
exempt from all taxation by the state or any political subdivision thereof.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 9.
October 1, 2013